Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB114.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 72-7121 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 72-7121. (a) (1) Any student who meets the requirements of
this section shall be permitted to participate in any activities offered by
a school district that are regulated, supervised, promoted and developed
by the activities association referred to in K.S.A. 72-7114, and
amendments thereto.
(2) Any student participating in an activity pursuant to paragraph
(1) shall also be permitted to participate in any district-sponsored
events, ceremonies, programs or other functions directly related to
such activity.
(3) The board of education of a school district may adopt policies
regarding the participation of those students who are participating in
an activity pursuant to paragraph (1) in district-sponsored events,
ceremonies, programs or other functions that are not directly related to
such activity.
(b) A student shall be permitted to participate in any such
activities if such student:
(1) (A) Is a resident of the school district;
(2)(B) is enrolled and attending a virtual school as defined in
K.S.A. 72-3712, and amendments thereto, or a nonpublic elementary or
secondary school;
(3)(C) complies with the requirements of K.S.A. 72-6262, and
amendments thereto, prior to participation in any such activity;
(4)(D) meets any applicable age and eligibility requirements set
forth by the activities association referred to in K.S.A. 72-7114, and
amendments thereto, that are not otherwise in conflict with this section;
(5)(E) pays any fees required by the school district for
participation in such activity if such fees are generally imposed upon all
other students who participate in such activity; and
(6)(F) seeks participation at the appropriate school of the school
district that corresponds to where such student resides within the school
district's respective school attendance boundaries established by the
board of education of the school district; or
(2) (A) Is enrolled in and attending the Kansas academy of
mathematics and science as defined in K.S.A. 72-3903, and
amendments thereto;
(B) complies with the requirements of K.S.A. 72-6262, and
amendments thereto, prior to participation in any such activity;
(C) meets any applicable age and eligibility requirements set forth
by the activities association referred to in K.S.A. 72-7114, and
amendments thereto, that are not otherwise in conflict with this section;
(D) pays any fees required by the school district for participation
in such activity if such fees are generally imposed upon all other
students who participate in such activity; and
(E) seeks participation at the appropriate school of the school
district that corresponds to where the postsecondary educational
institution designated by the state board of regents for the Kansas
academy of mathematics and science program.
(b)(c) (1) Any student attending a home school who seeks to
participate in an activity in the student's resident school district shall be
deemed to meet any academic eligibility requirements established by
the activities association for participation in an activity if:
(A) The student is maintaining satisfactory progress towards

SENATE BILL No. 114—page 2
achievement or promotion to the next grade level; and
(B) the parent, teacher or organization that provides instruction to
the student submits an affidavit or transcript to the activities association
indicating the student meets the academic eligibility requirements of
subparagraph (A).
(2) Upon submission of an affidavit, the student attending a home
school shall be deemed to meet any academic eligibility requirements
established by the activities association and shall retain such academic
eligibility during the activity season for which such affidavit is
submitted.
(c)(d) Except as provided in subsection (d) (e), a student attending
a virtual school as defined in K.S.A. 72-3712, and amendments thereto,
who seeks to participate in an activity in the student's resident school
district shall not be required to enroll in or attend a minimum number
of courses at such school district.
(d)(e) The board of education of a school district may require a
student who participates in an activity pursuant to this section to enroll
in a particular course or complete a particular course as a condition of
participation, if such requirement is imposed upon all other students
who participate in such activity.
(e)(f) Except as provided in subsection (b) (c), any student who
seeks to participate in an activity pursuant to this section shall be
subject to any tryout or other participation requirements that are
otherwise applicable to all other students for participation in the
activity.
(g) Any student enrolled in a school operated by a school district
who withdraws from such school district and subsequently enrolls in an
accredited private school, a nonpublic elementary or secondary school,
as defined in K.S.A. 72-4345, and amendments thereto, or a virtual
school, as defined in K.S.A. 72-3712, and amendments thereto, shall
not be eligible for full participation in any activities offered by such
school district immediately following such student's withdrawal in
accordance with the academic eligibility policies of the activities
association referred to in K.S.A. 72-7114, and amendments thereto,
unless such student was eligible for full participation in any such
activities pursuant to the eligibility policies of such school district and
the activities association referred to in K.S.A. 72-7114, and amendment
thereto, on the date of withdrawal and such student participates in such
activities at the school from which such student withdrew. Such student
may be permitted limited participation in any such activities in
accordance with the eligibility policies of such school district and the
activities association referred to in K.S.A. 72-7114, and amendments
thereto.
(h) Any student who meets the requirements of this section and
participates in activities described in subsection (a) shall be entitled to
all rights and subject to all responsibilities of any other participating
student, except as otherwise provided in this section, regardless of such
student's enrollment status.
(i) It shall be unlawful for any school district or the activities
association referred to in K.S.A. 72-7114, and amendments thereto, to
discriminate against any student who meets the requirements of this
section based on such student's enrollment status.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 72-7121 is hereby repealed.

SENATE BILL No. 114—page 3
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
__________________________
SENATE adopted
________________
Conference Committee Report
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
as amended
HOUSE adopted
________________
Conference Committee Report
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
_____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.